District of Columbia statutes.
18-112

Taking and carrying away, or destroying, mutilating, or secreting will.

Whoever, during the life or after the death of the testator, for a fraudulent purpose, takes and carries away, or destroys, mutilates, or secretes, a testamentary instrument, shall be imprisoned not more than five years. In addition to any other penalty provided under this section, a person may be fined an amount not more than the amount set forth in [§ 22-3571.01].

History

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 687, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 301, 60 DCR 2064

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 18-112.
1973 Ed., § 18-112.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 added the last sentence.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 301 of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.